Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 7 Retirement of Employees of Schools and Educational Institutions
Subchapter 2
— Arkansas Teacher Retirement System — General Provisions

Cross References.

Certain employees of educational institutions to be members of Public Employees' Retirement System, § 24-7-1002.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1973, No. 427, § 11, as added by Acts 1973, No. 878, § 1: Apr. 16, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the provisions of this Act would substantially revise the provisions and benefits provided in the Teacher Retirement System law; that it is essential that such revision be given effect on July 1, 1973 in order that the effective date of the Act will coincide with the beginning of a new fiscal year; that under the Constitution of Arkansas, Acts without an emergency clause do not take effect until ninety days after adjournment of the General Assembly and that unless an emergency is declared, extension of the regular session of the General Assembly will result in a delay in the effectiveness of this Act beyond July 1 and would work irreparable harm upon the teachers of this State. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1973, No. 878, § 2: Apr. 16, 1973. Emergency clause provided. “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 427 of 1973 relating to and making substantial revisions in the Teacher Retirement System did not contain an Emergency Clause; that it is essential to the proper administration of the Teacher Retirement System that the new provisions be given effect on July 1, 1973; that this Act is immediately necessary to amend Act 427 of 1973 to declare an emergency in order that said Act may be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975, No. 549, § 16: Mar. 25, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the unprecedented increase in the cost of living has resulted in a particular hardship to persons living on a fixed retirement income in the State of Arkansas; that it is essential to the health and well being of the retired and active schoolteachers of this State that the benefits received by them be increased immediately to offset this unusual cost of living increase and that this act should be given effect immediately in order to accomplish this purpose. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 619, § 14: July 1, 1983. Emergency clauses provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certain provisions of the Teacher Retirement Law are badly in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy and that such correction and updating is of great importance to members of the Teacher Retirement System and to all other citizens of the state of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1983.”

Acts 1983, No. 665, § 14: July 1, 1983. Emergency clauses provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certain provisions of the Teacher Retirement Law are badly in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy and that such correction and updating is of great importance to members of the Teacher Retirement System and to all other citizens of the state of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1983.”

Acts 1985, No. 105, § 4: Feb. 12, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the Arkansas Retired Teacher's Association has a comprehensive program for involving its members in community service, continuing education, and personal growth and development and that these activities are making a major contribution to the well being of many citizens of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from all and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1985, No. 805, § 12: July 1, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certain provisions of the Teacher Retirement Law are badly in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy and that such revision and updating is of great importance to members of the Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1985.”

Acts 1989, No. 376, § 4: Mar. 7, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the Arkansas Education Association/National Education Association Retired has a comprehensive program for involving its members in community service, continuing education, and personal growth and development and that these activities are making a major contribution to the well-being of many citizens of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1989, No. 652, § 14: July 1, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certain provisions of the Teacher Retirement Law are badly in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy and that such revision and updating is of great importance to members of the Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1989.”

Acts 1993, No. 435, § 12: July 1, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly that changed conditions have dictated that certain provisions of the Teacher Retirement law need to be revised and updated, that these changes are necessary for the System to continue with proper management and administration, and that the revisions in the law are essential to the continued effective operation of the Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1993.”

Acts 1993, No. 897, § 5: July 1, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly that the education of the citizens of Arkansas will be served by allowing the service or employment with an educationally-related agency to be included within the provisions of the Teacher Retirement law; that the service with educationally-related agencies will be of no cost to the state or the System; and that the System laws should be revised to permit this service to be counted as System covered service credit to benefit Arkansas' children with the most effective education possible. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1993.”

Acts 1995, No. 460, § 6: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that current language in the federal Internal Revenue Code makes it imperative that changes be made in laws concerning the Teacher Retirement System; that those changes need to be made at the beginning of the state fiscal year on July 1st; and that these changes are essential to the continued efficient and effective operation of the Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, in order to maintain an effective administration of the System, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 1995, No. 542, § 10: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that changing conditions have dictated that certain provisions of the Teacher Retirement System law need to be revised and updated, that these changes are necessary for the System to continue with proper management and administration, and that the revisions in the law are essential to the continued effective operation of the Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 1995, No. 638, § 6: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that this act is essential to the continued operation of the Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 1997, No. 142, § 8: July 1, 1997.

Acts 1997, No. 1064, § 5: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the current trend in government and school administration is to privatize more and more school services; that many school districts in Arkansas are following this privatization trend; that many employees of the school districts will go to work for those privatized enterprises; that it is in the best interest of State of Arkansas and its public schools to continue to allow these employees to remain members of the Teacher Retirement System; and that the best practices of fiscal management for the System require that this act be effective at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, in order to accommodate the developing trends in school administration and sound fiscal administration, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall become effective July 1, 1997.”

Acts 1997, No. 1137, § 9: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System and the Teacher Retirement System were created to benefit the public employees and the employees of the public educational institutions and school districts of Arkansas; that increases in both the retirement system's asset values allow for increases in systems members' benefits; that most retirements under the Public Employees' Retirement System and the Teacher Retirement System are effective on July 1 and any delay in the effective date of this act beyond July 1, 1997 will cause an undue hardship in administering this act. Therefore, in order to promote the sound fiscal administration of State government, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall become effective July 1, 1997.”

Acts 1999, No. 11, § 7: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that the Teacher Retirement System law does not recognize certain payments made by schools to teaching personnel as salary payments as defined under the retirement law, that allowing a broader definition of salary will help members achieve higher salaries for credit in the retirement system, that by increasing the benefits to members, more educators will be encouraged to stay in the teaching career fields, and that the most effective time to make changes to the retirement system is at the beginning of the State's fiscal year and therefore this act should take effect immediately at that time. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 29, § 6: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that certain Teacher Retirement System retirants, for personal reasons which they do not wish disclosed, may want to suspend their benefits, that providing retirants with this option leaves the system open to question about liability for these suspended benefits and the law needs clarification in this situation, and that the most effective time to make changes to the retirement system is at the beginning of the state's fiscal year and therefore this act should take effect immediately at that time. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 2001, No. 155, § 5: Retroactive to January 1, 2001.

Acts 2001, No. 155, § 7: Feb. 8, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System law need to be reconciled with federal tax laws; that these changes should take place retroactively to January 1, 2001; and that this act should have immediate effect. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2001, No. 461, § 7: July 1, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that it is a necessity to set a normal retirement age for eligibility for retirement benefits in order to maintain the integrity of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System; and that changes in legal provisions of the retirement system can most effectively be managed at the beginning of the state's fiscal year; and therefore this act should take effect with the beginning of the state's fiscal year. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2001.”

Acts 2005, No. 71, § 5: July 1, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the applicability of the Internal Revenue Code is unclear in current Arkansas Teacher Retirement Systems laws; that this act is necessary to clarify the issue and ensure consistent and correct application of Arkansas Teacher Retirement System provisions; and that the most effective time to make changes to the retirement system is at the beginning of the state's fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2005.”

Acts 2005, No. 146, § 4: July 1, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the current laws applicable to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System are unclear regarding certain eligibility and benefit requirements; that revisions are necessary to ensure the effective and efficient operation of the system; and that the most effective time to make changes to the retirement system is at the beginning of the state's fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2005.”

Acts 2005, No. 1026, § 2: July 1, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System has no mechanism to recoup overpayment in certain circumstances; that the absence of the ability leads to the potential loss of funds from the system; and that the most effective time to make changes to the retirement system is at the beginning of the state's fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2005.”

Acts 2005, No. 2190, § 24: Apr. 13, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the services of the county boards of education are no longer needed by the school districts; that there will be no funding available for the operation of the county boards of education; and that this act is immediately necessary because county boards of education need sufficient authority to transfer functions, duties, and records prior the end of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2007, No. 97, § 19: July 1, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the current laws applicable to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System require technical revisions; that revisions are necessary to ensure the effective and efficient operation of the system; and that the most effective time to make changes to the retirement system is at the beginning of the state’s fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2009, No. 465, § 2:
July 1, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are badly in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy; that such revision and updating is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2009.”

Acts 2009, No. 468, § 28:
July 1, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are in dire need of technical correction to bring them into conformance with the current public pension policy; that such technical correction is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2009.”

Acts 2009, No. 1325, § 2: July 1, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are badly in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy; that such revision and updating is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2009.”

Acts 2011, No. 45, § 22: Feb. 16, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System statutes are in urgent need of revision to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy; that this revision is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System assets and accounting are complex, and the system must be able to appropriately manage the system members accounts and benefits; that many of these technical corrections are currently the policy of the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and should be codified to reflect that policy; and that this act is immediately necessary to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2011, No. 69, § 22: July 1, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System statutes are in urgent need of revision to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy; that this revision is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; that a member's purchase of service credit currently provides that a member pay the system yesterday's dollars for the value of today's benefits; that such a valuation is unfair to the members as a whole and inconsistent with the prudent management of the system's funds and obligations; that the purchase of service credit in the system should be based upon actuarial equivalents; that the purchase of service credit should be paid in a lump sum to the system; that current service purchase accounts remain unpaid and inactive for many years at a time and create an administrative burden and accounting difficulty on the system that can be remedied by the passage of this act; and that this act is necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2011.”

Acts 2011, No. 138, § 3: July 1, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System statutes are in urgent need of revision to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy; that finality of decisions and calculations after four (4) fiscal years are needed to better allocate system resources; that this revision is of great importance to benefit participants and employers of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; and that this act is necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2011.”

Acts 2011, No. 163, § 3: Mar. 4, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System are in urgent need of revision and updating to bring them into compliance with sound public pension policy; that this revision is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System should not provide service credit for contract buyouts when services are not provided on-site to the employer to prevent undue costs from being passed on to the system by contract buyout participants obtaining vesting and service credit rights that otherwise would not be earned or payable; and that this act is immediately necessary because allowing inactive contract buyouts for service credit is poor public policy. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 336, § 2: Mar. 14, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are in need of revision to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy; that members may not be able to retire as they have planned and anticipated because of outstanding underpayments to the system; that current law does not allow for another mechanism to make underpayments to the system; that the provisions of this act allows a member to settle past obligations to the system and retire as they anticipated; and that this act is immediately necessary to have an impact on members who are planning on retiring at the end of the school year and who are otherwise eligible to retire. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 521, § 4: Mar. 28, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are in need of revision to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy; that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System must administer member's accounts in certain situations involving a claim or dispute to which the system is not a party but for which clear rules are necessary; and that this act is immediately necessary to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2015, No. 301, § 11: Mar. 4, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the operations of a state public retirement system are complex and the system must be able to meet the needs of its members as anticipated by the General Assembly; that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are imminently in need of clarification to operate the system efficiently and effectively; that such clarification is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2017, No. 241, § 2: Feb. 21, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that an error in the records of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System concerning a member's service credit may be detrimental to a member; that the ability to correct certain types of errors within the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System provides justice to a member; and that this act is immediately necessary to provide a remedy to a member of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2017, No. 293, § 9: Feb. 28, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the operations of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System are complex; that the system must be able to meet the needs of its members as anticipated by the General Assembly; that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are imminently in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy and actuarial requirements; that such revision and updating is of great importance to members of the system and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; that the system needs to have the ability to make immediate changes to maintain and improve its actuarial status; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly management of benefits for the members of the system. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2017, No. 436, § 4: Mar. 9, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the operations of a state public retirement system are complex; that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System must be able to meet the needs of its members as anticipated by the General Assembly; that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are imminently in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy and actuarial requirements; that such revision and updating is of great importance to members of the system and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; that the system needs to have the ability to make immediate changes to maintain and improve its actuarial status; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 427, § 23: July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act, an act that created a state agency for the purpose of providing retirement benefits to school employees of the state, are in need of revision and updating to maintain the teacher retirement laws in conformance with sound public pension policy; that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System operates on a fiscal year of July 1 to June 30; that a July 1, 2019 effective date is necessary to allow the provisions of this act to begin on the first day of the fiscal year and to provide for the proper administration of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System; that the updates and revisions to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are of great importance for actuarial purposes and the protection of member benefits under the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System; and that this act is necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

24-7-201. Title.

This act, which establishes the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System, may be cited as the “Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act”.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 427, § 1; 1975, No. 549, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1436.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1977, No. 793, § 11(2), provided that §§ 24-2-201 — 24-2-206 should not apply to the Teacher Retirement System since the investment provisions of chapter 3 of this title are the sole and exclusive method and procedure by which investments of the four named retirement systems may be made.

Meaning of “this act”.

Acts 1973, No. 427, codified as §§ 24-7-201 — 24-7-205, 24-7-301 — 24-7-305, 24-7-401 — 24-7-411, 24-7-501, 24-7-502, 24-7-601 — 24-7-604, 24-7-701, 24-7-702, 24-7-704 — 24-7-713, 24-7-715, 24-7-716.